Utah statutes.
53-7-409.   Sale outside of Utah.
Nothing in this part shall be construed to prohibit any person or entity from
manufacturing or selling cigarettes that do not meet the requirements of
Section 53-7-403 if the cigarettes are or will be stamped for sale in another
state or are packaged for sale outside the United States and that person or
entity has taken reasonable steps to ensure that such cigarettes will not be
sold or offered for sale to persons located in this state.
